District of Columbia statutes.
31-2231.21

“Twisting” prohibited.

No person shall make or issue, or cause to be made or issued, a written or oral statement misrepresenting or making incomplete comparisons as to the terms, conditions, or benefits contained in a policy for the purpose of inducing or attempting or tending to induce the policyholder to lapse, forfeit, surrender, retain, exchange, or convert an insurance policy.

Apr. 3, 2001, D.C. Law 13-265, § 121, 48 DCR 1225